Washington statutes.
RCW 15.65.380

Additional agreement or order provisions.

Any marketing agreement or order may contain any other, further, and different provisions which are incidental to and not inconsistent with this chapter and which the director finds to be needed and reasonably adapted to effectuate the declared policies of this chapter. The provisions shall set forth the detailed application of this chapter to the affected agricultural commodity.

[ 2002 c 313 s 33; 1961 c 256 s 38.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2002 c 313: See note following RCW 15.65.020.